dev/mt_wiktionary/noun.all.fat.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- tabiba; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/abiba__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abiba</l>
          <r>abiba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>obba</l>
          <r>abiba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- alluċinazzjoni; alluċinazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="alluċinazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- unjoni; unjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="unjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- frawla; frawl; 2 -->
    <pardef n="frawl/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- karità; karit; 2 -->
    <pardef n="karit/à__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiet</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- varjetà; varjet; 2 -->
    <pardef n="varjet/à__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiet</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fardal; f; 2 -->
    <pardef n="f/ardal__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardal</l>
          <r>ardal<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>radal</l>
          <r>ardal<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġenerazzjoni; ġenerazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġenerazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- reliġjon; reliġjon; 2 -->
    <pardef n="reliġjon__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tagħbija; tagħbij; 2 -->
    <pardef n="tagħbij/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iet</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nagħġa; nagħ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="nagħ/ġa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ġa</l>
          <r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aġ</l>
          <r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- attriċi; att; 2 -->
    <pardef n="att/riċi__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riċi</l>
          <r>riċi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uri</l>
          <r>riċi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- annimala; annimal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="annimal/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pjaċir; pjaċir; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pjaċir__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nominazzjoni; nominazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="nominazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- popolazzjoni; popolazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="popolazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- introduzzjoni; introduzzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="introduzzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- deċiżjoni; deċiżjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="deċiżjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sħubija; sħubij; 2 -->
    <pardef n="sħubij/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iet</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sigarru; sigarr; 2 -->
    <pardef n="sigarr/u__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- libsa; l; 2 -->
    <pardef n="l/ibsa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibsa</l>
          <r>ibsa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibies</l>
          <r>ibsa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- orjentazzjoni; orjentazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="orjentazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qattus; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/attus__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>attus</l>
          <r>attus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tates</l>
          <r>attus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kowt; kowt; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kowt__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ripressjoni; ripressjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ripressjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tabiba"><i>t</i><par n="t/abiba__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="alluċinazzjoni"><i>alluċinazzjoni</i><par n="alluċinazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="unjoni"><i>unjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="frawla"><i>frawl</i><par n="frawl/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karità"><i>karit</i><par n="karit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="varjetà"><i>varjet</i><par n="varjet/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fardal"><i>f</i><par n="f/ardal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġenerazzjoni"><i>ġenerazzjoni</i><par n="ġenerazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="reliġjon"><i>reliġjon</i><par n="reliġjon__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħbija"><i>tagħbij</i><par n="tagħbij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nagħġa"><i>nagħ</i><par n="nagħ/ġa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="attriċi"><i>att</i><par n="att/riċi__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="annimala"><i>annimal</i><par n="annimal/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pjaċir"><i>pjaċir</i><par n="pjaċir__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nominazzjoni"><i>nominazzjoni</i><par n="nominazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="popolazzjoni"><i>popolazzjoni</i><par n="popolazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="introduzzjoni"><i>introduzzjoni</i><par n="introduzzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="deċiżjoni"><i>deċiżjoni</i><par n="deċiżjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sħubija"><i>sħubij</i><par n="sħubij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sigarru"><i>sigarr</i><par n="sigarr/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="libsa"><i>l</i><par n="l/ibsa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="orjentazzjoni"><i>orjentazzjoni</i><par n="orjentazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qattus"><i>q</i><par n="q/attus__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kowt"><i>kowt</i><par n="kowt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ripressjoni"><i>ripressjoni</i><par n="ripressjoni__n_f"/></e>
